Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2498.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 108(a)(1)(i) of the act of November 10, 1999 (P.L.491, No.45), known as the Pennsylvania Construction Code Act, is amended to read:Section 108. Review of updated sections and adoption of updated sections into Uniform Construction Code.(a) Code review process.--(1) (i) Except as specifically provided in this act with respect:12345678910111213141516171819202122 (A) to the 2015 changes to the Uniform Construction Code adopted by the council; [and](B) to the procedure outlined in subparagraph (iii)[,]; and(C) to the procedures outlined in section 108.1,the council shall commence its review of the updated sections 21 months following the publication of a new edition of the ICC codes in accordance with paragraph (3). Notwithstanding any other provision of this act to the contrary, the council shall initiate a new review of the updated sections contained in the 2015 edition of the ICC codes within 30 days of the effective date of this section, and this review shall be referred to as the 2015 Code Review. The decisions by the council with respect to the 2015 edition of the ICC codes previously provided to the department on May 29, 2015, and the regulations promulgated by the department as a result shall remain in full force and effect until September 30, 2018. As of October 1, 2018, the decisions of the council as a result of the 2015 Code Review and the regulations promulgated by the department as a result shall supersede any previous inconsistent council decisions or departmental regulations.* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding sections to read:Section 108.1. Pause of review of 2024 ICC codes, review of existing codes and creation of alternative economic standards to reduce construction costs.(a) Pause review process.--(1) The council shall not commence the review of the 20260HB2498PN3383 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 2024 publication of ICC codes under section 108.(2) Beginning January 1, 2027, the council shall review existing codes and establish alternative economic standards for the purpose of reducing construction costs in Pennsylvania.(b) Review of existing codes.--(1) The process of reviewing existing codes under subsection (a)(2) shall include a 120-day period to receive comments from council members and the general public regarding the existing code, to which the following shall apply:(i) All public comments shall be submitted on a form created by the council. Each comment shall relate to a single code requirement. The comment shall, at a minimum, specify the requirement to which the comment relates, state how the requirement increases construction costs and provide an explanation on how safety will be maintained if the requirement is omitted from or modified for the alternative economic code.(ii) Each public comment submitted in accordance with subparagraph (i) shall be provided to each council member and posted on the department's publicly accessible Internet website. Each public comment submitted in accordance with subparagraph (i) shall be reviewed individually by a technical advisory committee.(2) A technical advisory committee shall review all of the requirements referenced in comments submitted in accordance with paragraph (1)(i). The technical advisory committee may review any related requirement or section of the code as needed to ensure consistency and effectiveness of 20260HB2498PN3383 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the Uniform Construction Code. Even if a requirement or section of the code is not referenced in a comment submitted in accordance with paragraph (1)(i), a technical advisory committee member may select one or more requirements or sections for individual consideration by the council under section 108(a)(3)(ix)(B).(3) For each comment requirement or section that:(i) is referenced in a comment submitted in accordance with paragraph (1)(i); or(ii) a member of the technical advisory committee to which it has been assigned has separately selected for individual review by the council, the technical advisory committee shall submit to the chair of the council a recommendation that the requirement, section or any related requirements or sections identified in paragraph (2) remain in effect, be removed or modified. The technical advisory committee shall submit the rationale for its recommendations.(4) The technical advisory committee's recommendations shall be posted on the department's publicly accessible Internet website at least 10 business days prior to holding the first hearing pursuant to this section.(5) After submission of all recommendations of the technical advisory committees, the council shall hold at least three public hearings as follows:(i) One hearing shall be held in Harrisburg.(ii) One shall be held in the eastern region of this Commonwealth, as determined by the department.(iii) One hearing shall be held in the western region of this Commonwealth, as determined by the 20260HB2498PN3383 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 department.(c) Council determinations.--(1) Upon completion of the hearings required under subsection (b)(5), the council shall hold one or more official meetings of the council to decide whether any requirements, sections or any related requirements or sections identified in subsection (b)(2) or identified in the three public hearings in accordance with subsection (b)(5) remain in effect, be removed or modified. The council shall consider the cost savings and impact on safety due to the removal or modification of any requirement, section or a related requirement identified in subsection (b)(2) or identified in the three public hearings in accordance with subsection (b)(5). The council shall consider and vote on whether any requirements, sections or any related requirements or sections identified in subsection (b)(2) or identified in the three public hearings in accordance with subsection (b)(5) remain in effect, be removed or modified. A two-thirds majority of the council shall be required to determine final action for each requirement, section or related requirement or section.(2) The council shall submit a report to the secretary within the 24-month period following the commencement of the review process by the council and shall include the sections that are specified for modification or removal.Section 108.2. Resumption of 2027 and Successor ICC code review.(a) Review of 2027 ICC codes.--Beginning January 1, 2030, the council shall commence a review of the 2027 ICC codes in accordance with section 108(a)(3).20260HB2498PN3383 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Review of updated sections.--Beginning January 1, 2033, the council shall commence a review of updated sections 21 months following the publication of a new edition of the ICC codes in accordance with section 108(a)(3).Section 3. Section 304(a)(1) of the act is amended to read:Section 304. Revised or successor codes.(a) Duties of department.--(1) Subject to sections 105(c) and (d), 108.1(c), 301(a)(3), (4), (5), (6) and (7), (c) and (d) and 302, within nine months of the receipt of the report under section 108(b), the department shall promulgate final-omitted regulations under the act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act, to adopt the council's decisions contained in the report without change. The regulations shall take effect as follows:(i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii), regulations adopted under this act shall become effective 33 months after the commencement of council review as provided for in section 108(a)(1)(i).(ii) Regulations promulgated by the department as a result of the 2015 Code Review shall take effect October 1, 2018.(iii) Regulations promulgated by the department as a result of the 2024 pause of code review process shall take effect October 1, 2030, which shall expire October 1, 2040.* * *Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2498PN3383 - 6 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728